Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.050

Boundaries—Name—Inclusion, exclusion of lands.

The board of county commissioners shall designate a name for and fix the boundaries of the proposed district following such hearing. No land shall be included in the boundaries as fixed by the county commissioners which was not described in the petition, unless the owners of such land shall consent in writing thereto.

The board of county commissioners shall eliminate from the boundaries of the proposed district land which they find will not be benefited by inclusion therein.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.69.050. Prior: 1957 c 58 s 5.]